Hawaii statutes.
[§37-122] Routine repair and maintenance
funding needs; report to legislature. (a) Each state executive agency
that manages a state-owned building, facility, or other improvement shall
submit to the legislature an annual report on the funds and positions deemed
necessary by the agency to perform routine repair and maintenance on the state-owned
building, facility, or other improvement during the fiscal year covered by the
report. The annual report shall cover the fiscal year that commences following
the submittal of the report and break down the funds and positions deemed
necessary for routine repair and maintenance by means of financing and cost
element.

(b) The annual report shall also include a
comparison, for each of the prior two fiscal years, of the:

(1) Routine repair and maintenance funds and
positions deemed necessary by the state executive agency, as identified in the
relevant prior reports;

(2) Actual appropriations and positions authorized
for routine repair and maintenance; and

(3) Actual expenditures and positions filled for the
routine repair and maintenance.

(c) The annual reports shall be submitted to
the legislature through the department of budget and finance with each
executive budget or supplemental budget, as applicable.

(d) The governor shall identify the state
executive agencies that are responsible for managing a state-owned building,
facility, or other improvement and, consequently, required to submit the annual
report to the legislature. The governor shall require the identified state
agencies to submit the reports to the department of budget and finance:

(1) In a uniform format; and

(2) By a deadline intended to give the department of
budget and finance sufficient time to compile the reports to the legislature
pursuant to subsection (c).

The department of budget and finance shall not
be required to ensure the accuracy of the information in the reports. [L 2016,
c 233, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next